Maryland, session 2026, HB0072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
SUBTITLE 22. EDIBLE FORESTS AND FORAGING PROGRAM.
5–2201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DESIGNATED FORAGING AREA” MEANS DEPARTMENT–OWNED LAND
DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT FOR FORAGING IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–2202
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) “EDIBLE FOREST” MEANS STATE–OWNED LAND THAT IS CULTIVATED
FOR THE PURPOSE OF HARVESTING NONINVASIVE PLANTS FOR NONCOMMERCIAL
PERSONAL CONSUMPTION.
(D) (1) “FORAGING” MEANS HARVESTING MUSHROOMS OR PLANT
MATERIALS, INCLUDING SEEDS, NUTS, ROOTS, TUBERS, AND BERRIES, FOR
NONCOMMERCIAL PERSONAL CONSUMPTION.
(2) “FORAGING” DOES NOT INCLUDE HARVESTING THREATENED OR
ENDANGERED PLANT SPECIES DESIGNATED UNDER § 10–2A–04 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(E) “FORAGING PERMIT” MEANS THE PERMIT THAT AUTHORIZES FORAGING
IN A DESIGNATED FORAGING AREA.
(F) “FUND” MEANS THE EDIBLE FORESTS AND FORAGING FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–2205 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE EDIBLE FORESTS AND FORAGING PROGRAM.

HOUSE BILL 72 3
5–2202.
(A) THERE IS AN EDIBLE FORESTS AND FORAGING PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO:
(1) DESIGNATE FORAGING AREAS;
(2) AUTHORIZE AND REGULATE FORAGING WITHIN DESIGNATED
FORAGING AREAS; AND
(3) FACILITATE THE ESTABLISHMENT AND MAINTENANCE OF EDIBLE
FORESTS.
5–2203.
(A) THERE IS A FORAGING PERMIT.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL OBTAIN A FORAGING PERMIT TO FORAGE WITHIN
A DESIGNATED FORAGING AREA.
(C) TO OBTAIN A FORAGING PERMIT, AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL:
(1) SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, PAY AN
APPLICATION FEE, AS SET BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL WAIVE THE FORAGING PERMIT APPLICATION
FEE FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO DEMONSTRATES FINANCIAL NEED.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE AN INDIVIDUAL TO SUCCESSFULLY
COMPLETE AN ORIENTATION OR A FORAGING COURSE BEFORE RECEIVING A
PERMIT.
(F) A FORAGING PERMIT SHALL BE VALID FOR 1 YEAR FOLLOWING THE
DATE OF ISSUANCE.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION, INCLUDING REGULATIONS:
(1) DESIGNATING FORAGING AREAS ON DEPARTMENT–OWNED LAND;

HOUSE BILL 72
(2) ESTABLISHING A FORAGING PERMIT APPLICATION FEE; AND
(3) ESTABLISHING A FEE WAIVER PROCESS FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO
DEMONSTRATE FINANCIAL NEED.
5–2204.
(A) SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE FUNDING, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN EDIBLE FORESTS ON STATE–OWNED LAND.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING § 5–2203 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE DEPARTMENT
MAY NOT REQUIRE AN INDIVIDUAL TO OBTAIN A FORAGING PERMIT TO FORAGE IN
AN EDIBLE FOREST.
5–2205.
(A) THERE IS AN EDIBLE FORESTS AND FORAGING FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO SUPPORT:
(1) THE DESIGNATION OF FORAGING AREAS; AND
(2) THE CULTIVATION OF NONINVASIVE PLANTS ON STATE–OWNED
LAND TO BE USED AS EDIBLE FORESTS.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) PERMIT APPLICATION FEES COLLECTED UNDER § 5–2203 OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND

HOUSE BILL 72 5
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR:
(1) DESIGNATING, PLANTING, AND MAINTAINING DESIGNATED
FORAGING AREAS AND EDIBLE FORESTS; AND
(2) ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 1–103(B)(2) OF THIS ARTICLE.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law or by regulation of the
Treasurer, the Treasurer shall credit to the General Fund any interest on or other income
from State money that the Treasurer invests.
(2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND

HOUSE BILL 72
214. THE EDIBLE FORESTS AND FORAGING FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.